Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-324
Change of address; election commissioner or county clerk; duties; acknowledgment of registration; when.

(1) When a person who previously has been registered to vote in another state registers to vote in Nebraska, the election commissioner or county clerk accepting the registration shall notify the appropriate election official in the other state that the voter has registered in Nebraska. The notification shall contain the printed or typewritten name and previous address of the registered voter and the signature or certification of the election commissioner or county clerk.

(2) The election commissioner or county clerk accepting an application for registration from a voter who was previously registered in a different county in Nebraska shall update the voter's voter registration record with the information from the application and shall send an acknowledgment to the voter indicating that the change of registration has been completed. The acknowledgment shall advise the voter of the address of his or her new polling place.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 86;

Laws 1997, LB 764, § 42;

Laws 2005, LB 566, § 25.